Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.040

District judges—Full time—Other.

A district judge serving a district having a population of forty thousand or more persons, and a district judge receiving a salary equal to the maximum salary set by the salary commission under RCW 3.58.020 for district judges shall be deemed full time judges and shall devote all of their time to the office and shall not engage in the practice of law. Other judges shall devote sufficient time to the office to properly fulfill the duties thereof and may engage in other occupations but shall maintain a separate office for private business and shall not use for private business the services of any clerk or secretary paid for by the county or office space or supplies furnished by the judicial district.

[ 1991 c 338 s 2; 1984 c 258 s 10; 1983 c 195 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 95 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 147 s 2; 1961 c 299 s 13.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.